Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2017
Supervising physician, defined.

Supervising physician means a licensed physician who supervises a physician assistant under a collaborative agreement.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 675;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 40;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 8.